Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [14.1265] LEGISLATIVE AUTHORITY OVER RULE ADOPTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Rule effective after ratification. new text end new text begin A proposed rule is not effective until the rule is ratified. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Vote. new text end new text begin Ratification occurs upon the signature of the governor on a law passed by the legislature approving the rule within one year of the publication of the notice of adoption of the rule in the State Register under section 14.18; 14.27; 14.389, subdivision 3; or 14.3895, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exception for emergency rules. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to rules adopted by executive order under section 12.22. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin A notice of ratification must be published in the State Register within five days of ratification. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.18, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Generally. A rule is effective after it has been subjected to all requirements described in sections 14.131 to 14.20 and five working days after the notice of deleted text begin adoptiondeleted text end new text begin ratificationnew text end is published in the State Register unless a later date is required by section 14.126 or other law or specified in the rule. If the rule adopted is the same as the proposed rule, publication may be made by publishing notice in the State Register that the rule has been adopted as proposed and by citing the prior publication. If the rule adopted differs from the proposed rule, the portions of the adopted rule that differ from the proposed rule must be included in the notice of adoption together with a citation to the prior State Register publication of the remainder of the proposed rule. The nature of the modifications must be clear to a reasonable person when the notice of adoption is considered together with the State Register publication of the proposed rule, except that modifications may also be made that comply with the form requirements of section 14.07, subdivision 7. If the agency omitted from the notice of proposed rule adoption the text of the proposed rule, as permitted by section 14.14, subdivision 1a, paragraph (b), the chief administrative law judge may provide that the notice of the adopted rule need not include the text of any changes from the proposed rule. However, the notice of adoption must state in detail the substance of the changes made from the proposed rule, and must state that a free copy of the portion of the adopted rule that was the subject of the rulemaking proceeding, not including any material adopted by reference as permitted by section 14.07, is available upon request to the agency. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 14.38, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Original rules. Every rule, regardless of whether it might be known as a substantive, procedural, or interpretive rule, which is filed in the Office of the Secretary of State as provided in sections 14.05 to 14.28 shall have the force and effect of law five working days after its notice of deleted text begin adoptiondeleted text end new text begin ratificationnew text end is published in the State Register unless a different date is required by statute or a later date is specified in the rule. The secretary of state shall keep a permanent record of rules filed with that office open to public inspection.